South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-3-4800(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The department may issue Sons of Confederate Veterans special license plates to owners of private passenger-carrying motor vehicles and motorcycles registered in their names. The fee for each special license plate is thirty dollars every two years in addition to the regular motor vehicle license fee set forth in Article 5, Chapter 3 of this title. Each special license plate must be of the same size and general design of regular motor vehicle license plates. Each special license plate shall not contain a confederate flag. Each special license plate must be issued or revalidated for a biennial period which expires twenty-four months from the month the special license plate is issued. Upon revalidation, a special license plate that does not contain a confederate flag must be issued to the owner of the vehicle or motorcycle to replace a special license plate that contains a confederate flag. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----